New York, session 2025-2026, A9031.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new article 17 2 to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 17 4 PROHIBITING THE SALE OF REAL PROPERTY 5 TO THE PEOPLE'S REPUBLIC OF CHINA 6 Section 530. Sale of real property to the People's Republic of China 7 prohibited. 8 § 530. Sale of real property to the People's Republic of China prohib- 9 ited. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be unlaw- 10 ful for any person or entity to lease, sell, offer to sell, convey or 11 transfer any interest in any real property located in this state to the 12 People's Republic of China or to the Chinese communist party, or any 13 affiliated entities. 14 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the attorney general 15 shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this section by 16 applying, in the name of the people of the state of New York, to the 17 supreme court of the state of New York for an order enjoining the 18 continuance of such violative activity, including but not limited to 19 bringing an action for injunctive or declaratory relief if any real 20 property is in the process of being or has been sold or leased in 21 violation of this section. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13593-01-5